New Mexico, session 2026, HB318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of Chapter 41 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] ACTION FOR DAMAGES--OBSTRUCTION, PREVENTION OR INFRINGEMENT OF THE EXERCISE OR ENJOYMENT OF RIGHTS, PRIVILEGES OR IMMUNITIES.-- A. As used in this section, "rights, privileges or immunities" means the individual rights, privileges and immunities secured by the United States constitution. B. A person whose exercise or enjoyment of rights, privileges or immunities is intentionally obstructed, prevented or infringed upon by another person through unlawful force, fraud or coercion or other unlawful means may maintain an action for damages in district court against the other person in the other person's individual capacity, regardless of whether the other person was acting under color of federal law. Such an action shall be commenced within three years from the date the action accrues. C. The rule of practice and decision for intentional torts in New Mexico shall apply to an action commenced pursuant to this section." - 2 -